Arkansas, session 2025, HB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Arkansas Promise Act — Higher education tuition income tax
credit — Definition.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Promise Act".
(b) As used in this section, "tuition" means charges levied for
attendance at a public two-year or four-year institution of higher education.
(c) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount paid by a taxpayer as tuition for the
taxpayer or the taxpayer's dependent not including tuition paid through any
scholarship or grant, subject to the limitations of subsection (d) of this
*CEB026*
01-16-2025 14:52:54 CEB026

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1026
section.
(d) To claim the income tax credit allowed by this section, the
taxpayer must have paid tuition for a student that:
(1) Is a resident with an in-state tuition classification;
(2)(A) Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student
Aid (FAFSA) or a subsequent application required by the United States
Department of Education for federal financial aid for the semester or term
for which the income tax credit is claimed.
(B) The income tax credit allowed by this section shall
only be claimed if the application under subdivision (d)(2)(A) reflects an
adjusted gross income, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1070a, of up to ninety
thousand dollars ($90,000);
(3) Is classified as degree- or credential-seeking pursuing a
certificate, associate degree, or bachelor's degree;
(4) Initially enrolled in the public two-year or four-year
institution of higher education for which the income tax credit is claimed
within two (2) years of graduating from high school or obtaining a high
school equivalency diploma;
(5) Has accumulated fewer than sixty-five (65) credit hours
prior to the first semester attended at the public two-year or four-year
institution of higher education for which the income tax credit is claimed;
(6) Has completed at least six (6) credit hours at the end of
each semester for which the income tax credit is claimed; and
(7) Has maintained a grade point average of at least 2.5 on a
4.0 scale for each semester for which the tax credit is claimed;
(e) The income tax credit allowed by this section may be claimed for
no more than four (4) consecutive academic semesters.
(f) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess shall be refunded to
the taxpayer.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/A. Collins

01-16-2025 14:52:54 CEB026